Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 1 General Provisions and Definitions
“Environmental law.” To encourage trustees to accept and administer trusts containing real property, the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code contains several provisions designed to limit exposure to possible liability for violation of environmental law. Section 701(c)(2) [T.C.A. § 35-15-701(c)(2) ] authorizes a nominated trustee to investigate trust property to determine potential liability for violation of environmental law or other law without accepting the trusteeship. Section 816(13) [T.C.A. § 35-15-816(b)(13) ] grants a trustee comprehensive and detailed powers to deal with property involving environmental risks. Finally, unlike Uniform Trust Code section 1010(b), T.C.A. § 35-15-1010 immunizes a trustee from personal liability for violation of environmental law arising from the ownership and control of trust property.

“Excluded fiduciary.” This term is included to define any person who would otherwise meet the definition of fiduciary, but who is relieved in one of the prescribed manners from any power or duty normally held by such relevant fiduciary and that power or duty is granted or reserved to another person.

Although T.C.A. § 35-15-103 only specifically includes any “trustee,” “trust advisor” or “trust protector” as being potential excluded fiduciaries, such section of the Tennessee Code should be read to include anyone who would otherwise meet the definition of fiduciary contained in T.C.A. § 35-15-103, but who is relieved in one of the prescribed manners from any power or duty normally held by such relevant fiduciary and that power or duty is granted or reserved to another person. Added by the 2013 amendments to Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

“Fiduciary.” This term is included for several reasons, including but not limited to:

To facilitate drafting by providing an all-inclusive word meaning any person having fiduciary powers and duties under the Tennessee trust statutes.

To cover trust advisors and trust protectors under part 12, or otherwise, if any of such are serving in a fiduciary capacity as provided in T.C.A. § 35-15-1202 or elsewhere under the Tennessee trust statutes.

To assure that any person, regardless of the nomenclature by which that person is called, when holding powers and carrying out duties that are normally fiduciary in nature is a fiduciary, unless that person is an excluded fiduciary. Added by the 2013 amendments to Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

“Foreign” or “foreign country.” The comments under “another state” or “other state” are incorporated herein by reference.

The distinctive statutory definition of the word “foreign,” either by itself or followed by the word “country” is included to demarcate the different meaning of those words, particularly “foreign,” in the Tennessee trust statutes from the meaning generally ascribed to the term foreign in state statutes (including the Tennessee Code in places other than under the Tennessee trust statutes) and in state court holdings and similar rulings. Outside the Tennessee trust statutes, the word “foreign” is often used simply to denote another state of the United States. However, the appropriate term for such under the Tennessee trust statutes is “another state” or “other state,” while “foreign” either by itself or followed by “country” means a jurisdiction other than the United States or a state (as such is defined in T.C.A. § 35-15-103). Added by the 2013 amendments to Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

“Foreign jurisdiction.” The comments under “another state” or “other state,” under “foreign” or “foreign country,” as well as under “this state,” are incorporated herein by reference.

By combining the word “foreign” with “jurisdiction,” the latter word being the generalized term for an area or matter under some domestic or foreign governmental control or authority, this statutory definition includes any jurisdiction (governmental authority) other than that of this state, the state of Tennessee.

It is included for similar reasons as those set forth under “foreign” or “foreign country,” above. It is also included for drafting convenience. By simply stating “foreign jurisdiction” a drafter can mean any other jurisdiction than that of this state, Tennessee. Added by the 2013 amendments to Tennessee Uniform Trust Code.

“Guardian.” Under the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code, both the term “guardian” and the term “conservator” have the same meaning as they respectfully do in T.C.A. § 34-1-101. Under such section; guardian means a person or persons appointed by the court to provide partial or full supervision, protection and assistance of the person or property, or both, of a minor; while conservator means a person or persons appointed by the court to provide partial or full supervision, protection and assistance of the person or property, or both, of a disabled person.

“Interests of the beneficiaries.” The phrase “interests of the beneficiaries” (subdivision (8)) [T.C.A. § 35-15-103(17) ] is used with some frequency in the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code. The definition clarifies that the interests are as provided in the terms of the trust and not as determined by the beneficiaries. Absent authority to do so in the terms of the trust, section 108 [T.C.A. § 35-15-108 ] prohibits a trustee from changing a trust's principal place of administration if the transfer would violate the trustee's duty to administer the trust at a place appropriate to the interests of the beneficiaries. Section 706(b) [T.C.A. § 35-15-706(b) ] conditions certain of the grounds for removing a trustee on the court's finding that removal of the trustee will best serve the interests of the beneficiaries. Section 801 [T.C.A. § 35-15-801 ] requires the trustee to administer the trust in the interests of the beneficiaries, and section 802 [T.C.A. § 35-15-802 ] makes clear that a trustee may not place its own interests above those of the beneficiaries. Section 808(d) [T.C.A. § 35-15-808(d) ] requires the holder of a power to direct who is subject to a fiduciary obligation to act with regard to the interests of the beneficiaries. T.C.A. § 35-15-1202 provides likewise. Section 1002(b) [T.C.A. § 35-15-1002(b) ] may impose greater liability on a cotrustee who commits a breach of trust with reckless indifference to the interests of the beneficiaries. Section 1008 [T.C.A. § 35-15-1008 ] invalidates an exculpatory term to the extent it relieves a trustee of liability for breach of trust committed with reckless indifference to the interests of the beneficiaries.

“Internal Revenue Code.” The definition of “internal revenue code” was added to T.C.A. § 35-15-103 with the 2013 amendments to the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code. The term as now defined in T.C.A. § 35-15-103 appeared in certain sections throughout the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code, while in certain other places in the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code and its comments it was referred to generically as “Internal Revenue Code,” or by similar words or abbreviations therefor. The 2013 amendments included the term’s definition in T.C.A. § 35-15-103 to make it consistently applicable throughout the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code. Nevertheless, it is still appropriate to refer to the Internal Revenue Code by its initials “I.R.C.” or through a full citation to title 26 of the United States Code or an abbreviation thereof. Moreover, a citation to “Treas. Reg. §” is an appropriate way to cite to the regulations under the Internal Revenue Code, as is a full citation to title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations or an abbreviation thereof.

“Jurisdiction.” (subdivision (9) [T.C.A. 35-5-103(19) ], when used with reference to a geographic area, includes a state or country but is not necessarily so limited. Its precise scope will depend on the context in which it is used. “Jurisdiction” is used in sections 107 and 403 [T.C.A. §§ 35-15-107 and 35-15-403 ] to refer to the place whose law will govern the trust. The term is used in section 108 [T.C.A. § 35-15-108 ] to refer to the trust’s principal place of administration. The term is used in section 816 [T.C.A. § 35-15-816 ] to refer to the place where the trustee may appoint an ancillary trustee and to the place in whose courts the trustee can bring and defend legal proceedings.

“Person.” The definition in T.C.A. § 35-15-103 is self sufficiently clear and needs no further explanation.

“Power of appointment.” A power of appointment as defined in the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code is a matter of state property law and not federal tax law; although there is considerable overlap between the two definitions.

A power of appointment is authority to designate the recipients of beneficial interests in property. See Restatement (Second) of Property: Donative Transfers § 11.1 (1986). A power is either general or nongeneral (such sometimes being called “special”) and either presently exercisable or not presently exercisable. A general power of appointment is a power exercisable in favor of the holder of the power, the power holder’s creditors, the power holder’s estate, or the creditors of the power holder’s estate. See Restatement (Second) of Property: Donative Transfers § 11.4 (1986). All other powers are nongeneral (such sometimes being called “special powers of appointment”). A power is presently exercisable if the power holder can currently create an interest, present or future, in an object of the power. A power of appointment is not presently exercisable if exercisable only by the power holder's will or if its exercise is not effective for a specified period of time or until occurrence of some event. See Restatement (Second) of Property: Donative Transfers § 11.5 (1986). Powers of appointment may be held in either a fiduciary or nonfiduciary capacity.

The Tennessee Uniform Trust Code makes distinctions among types of powers. Under T.C.A. § 35-15-302 the holder of any type of power of appointment may represent and bind persons whose interests are subject to the power. A “power of withdrawal” is defined as a presently exercisable general power of appointment other than a power exercisable by a trustee and limited by an ascertainable standard, or a power which is exercisable by another person only upon consent of the trustee or a person holding an adverse interest.

Finally, the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code makes two things crystal clear: A power of appointment, even when held by a trustee or other fiduciary, is different and distinct from any trustee’s or other fiduciary’s power to make decisions regarding distributions. Moreover, powers of appointment are held by the person to whom such power has been given in the distinct and singular capacity of a power holder. Therefore, if a settlor is given a power of appointment, such settlor holds that power of appointment as a power holder and not in that person’s capacity as settlor. Portions of the above (appropriately amended) were moved from the comment pertaining to beneficiary, while other portion of the above were added, both such types of changes were done to conform with the 2013 amendments to Tennessee Uniform Trust Code, which added a separate definition for “power of appointment.”

“Power of withdrawal.” The definition of “power of withdrawal,” was amended in 2007 to exclude a possible inference that the term includes a discretionary power in a trustee to make distributions for the trustee’s own benefit which is limited by an ascertainable standard. This was done to clarify that if a beneficiary is serving as trustee or co-trustee and has discretion to make a distribution to himself or for his own benefit pursuant to an ascertainable standard, then the creditor cannot reach or compel a distribution except to the extent the interest would be subject to a creditor's claim if the beneficiary were not acting as trustee or co-trustee.

“Property.” The definition of “property” (subdivision (12)) [T.C.A. § 35-15-103(23) ] is intended to be as expansive as possible and to encompass anything that may be the subject of ownership. Included are choses in action, claims, and interests created by beneficiary designations under policies of insurance, financial instruments, and deferred compensation and other retirement arrangements, whether revocable or irrevocable. Any such property interest is sufficient to support creation of a trust. See section 401 Section Comment [T.C.A. § 35-15-401 ].

“Qualified beneficiary.” Due to the difficulty of identifying beneficiaries whose interests are remote and contingent, and because such beneficiaries are not likely to have much interest in the day-to-day affairs of the trust, the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code uses the concept of “qualified beneficiary” (subdivision (12) [§ T.C.A. 35-15-103(24) ]) to limit the class of beneficiaries to whom certain notices must be given or consents received. The definition of qualified beneficiaries is used in section 705 [T.C.A. § 35-15-705 ] to define the class to whom notice must be given of a trustee resignation. The term is used in section 813 [T.C.A. § 35-15-813 ] to define the class that generally has the right to request from a trustee information regarding the trust’s administration. Section 417 [T.C.A. § 35-15-417 ] requires that notice be given to the qualified beneficiaries before a trust may be combined or divided. Actions which may be accomplished by the consent of the qualified beneficiaries include the appointment of a successor trustee as provided in section 704 [T.C.A. § 35-15-704 ], as well as the appointment of successor trust advisors and trust protectors. Prior to transferring a trust’s principal place of administration, T.C.A. § 35-15-108 requires that the trustee give at least 60 days notice to the qualified beneficiaries.

According to ULC - NCCUSL, the qualified beneficiaries consist of the beneficiaries currently eligible to receive a distribution from the trust together with those who might be termed the first-line remaindermen. These are the beneficiaries who would become eligible to receive distributions were the event triggering the termination of a beneficiary’s interest or of the trust itself to occur on the date in question. Such a terminating event will typically be the death or deaths of the beneficiaries currently eligible to receive the income. Should a qualified beneficiary be a minor, incapacitated, or unknown, or a beneficiary whose identity or location is not reasonably ascertainable, the representation and virtual representation principles of part 3 [T.C.A. §§ 35-15-301 – 35-15-305 ] may be employed, including the possible appointment by the court of a representative to represent the beneficiary’s interest.

According to ULC - NCCUSL, the qualified beneficiaries who take upon termination of the beneficiary’s interest or of the trust can include takers in default of the exercise of a power of appointment. The term can also include the persons entitled to receive the trust property pursuant to the exercise of a power of appointment. Because the exercise of a testamentary power of appointment is not effective until the testator’s death and probate of the will, the qualified beneficiaries do not include appointees under the will of a living person. Nor would the term include the objects of an unexercised inter vivos power.

The Tennessee Uniform Trust Code generally follows ULC - NCCUSL’s position as expressed in the prior two paragraphs. However, the group of persons who potentially qualify as qualified beneficiaries under Tennessee law is meaningfully smaller. Under the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code, as of any (and as of each) point in time at which it is necessary to determine which beneficiaries are qualified beneficiaries you do so assuming the following two things (neither of which are required by the Uniform Trust Code): any and all then existing powers of appointment will not be exercised; and any event then not reasonably expected to occur will not occur.

Moreover, under its definition of “qualified beneficiary” the Tennessee Uniform Trust Code provides that no ultimate beneficiary or potential ultimate beneficiary can ever be a qualified beneficiary or have the rights thereof. Additionally, no ultimate beneficiary or potential ultimate beneficiary has the standing to petition to remedy a breach of trust or to enforce a trust; the interests of such beneficiary being too remote. Notwithstanding the preceding portion of this paragraph, if and when the interests of any ultimate, or potential ultimate, beneficiary have ripened to the point that such beneficiary is eligible to receive, or have paid for their benefit, current distributions of income or principal, at such time they will no longer be an “ultimate beneficiary” or “potential ultimate beneficiary.” At such time such beneficiary has all the rights of any other current beneficiary of the same type, charitable or non-charitable. Similarly if a trust for animals or a trust for a noncharitable purpose (individually and collectively, “purpose trust”) is an ultimate, or potential ultimate, beneficiary, the rights of any person provided in [either] T.C.A. § 35-15-408 or § 35-15-409 to enforce the trust under which such purpose trust is an ultimate, or potential ultimate beneficiary will not ripen until such purpose trust is eligible to receive from the trust under which it was previously an ultimate, or potential ultimate, beneficiary, current distributions of income or principal.

If a right is acquired, extinguished, or barred upon the expiration of a prescribed period that has commenced to run under any other statute before July 1, 2013, that statute continues to apply to the right even if it has been repealed or superseded.